Illinois, session 104th, HB2998.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 51-26 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1-26 new)7    Sec. 1-26. Local elections; publication of information. 8All local election authorities shall post requirements and 9qualifications for running for local offices and petition 10filing deadlines on the website of the local election 11authority.